Illinois, session 104th, HB274.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Civil Liability for Doxing Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 195/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Civil 8Liability for Doxing Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-439, eff. 1-1-24.)